North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 3. Judicial Dissolution.

§ 55A-14-30.
Grounds for judicial dissolution.

The superior court may dissolve a corporation:

In a proceeding by the Attorney General if it is established that:

The corporation obtained its articles of incorporation through fraud; or

The corporation has, after written notice by the Attorney General given at least 20 days prior thereto, continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law;

In a proceeding by a member or director, if it is established that:

The directors are deadlocked in the management of the corporate affairs, and the members, if any, are unable to break the deadlock;

The directors or those in control of the corporation have acted, are acting, or will act in a manner that is illegal, oppressive, or fraudulent;

The members are deadlocked in voting power and have failed, for a period that includes at least two consecutive annual meeting dates, to elect successors to directors whose terms have, or would otherwise have, expired;

The corporate assets are being misapplied or wasted; or

The corporation is no longer able to carry out its purposes.

In a proceeding by a creditor if it is established that:

The creditor’s claim has been reduced to judgment and execution on the judgment has been returned unsatisfied; or

The corporation has admitted in writing that the creditor’s claim is due and owing and the corporation is insolvent.

In a proceeding by the corporation to have its voluntary dissolution continued under court supervision.

Prior to dissolving a corporation, the court shall consider whether:

There are reasonable alternatives to dissolution;

Dissolution is in the public interest, if the corporation is a charitable or religious corporation; and

Dissolution is reasonably necessary for the protection of the rights or interests of the members, if any.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 42; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This Act does not bring forward the duty of the Attorney General under former G.S. 55A-51 to bring an action for involuntary dissolution under certain circumstances.

Subdivision (a)(2) differs from prior law in the following respects: First, the requirement in former G.S. 55A-53(a)(1)a.
that “irreparable injury to the corporation or to the public” be established when the directors are deadlocked was not brought forward. Second, the prior law did not expressly provide that deadlock of the members was grounds for involuntary dissolution.

The requirement in former G.S. 55A-53(b) that a creditor must show that the corporation is insolvent in order to be entitled to judicial dissolution was not brought forward.

Even if there are grounds for dissolution under subsection (a), subsection (b) requires the court to consider other factors. Although former G.S. 55A-53(f), which permitted the court to grant relief other than dissolution, was not brought forward, the court has inherent power to grant such alternative relief under subsection (b). In addition, if dissolution is ordered and the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the dissolved corporation do not provide for the disposition of its assets, it is intended that the assets will be distributed or transferred as directed by the court. See former G.S. 55A-57(b) and (c).

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Common Law Powers of the Attorney General of North Carolina,” see 9 N.C. Cent. L.J. 1 (1977).

For note, “ The Nonprofit Corporation in North Carolina: Recognizing a Right to Member Derivative Suits,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 999 (1985).

§ 55A-14-31.
Procedure for judicial dissolution.

Venue for a proceeding to dissolve a corporation lies in the county where a corporation’s principal office, or, if there is none in this State, its registered office, is or was last located.

It is not necessary to make directors or members parties to a proceeding to dissolve a corporation unless relief is sought against them individually.

A court in a proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation may issue injunctions, appoint a receiver with all powers and duties the court directs, take other action required to preserve the corporate assets wherever located, and carry on the activities of the corporation.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 42; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-14-32.
Receivership.

A court in a judicial proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation may appoint one or more receivers to wind up and liquidate, or to manage, the affairs of the corporation. The court shall hold a hearing, after notifying all parties to the proceeding and any interested persons designated by the court, before appointing a receiver. The court appointing a receiver has exclusive jurisdiction over the corporation and all of its property wherever located.

The court may appoint an individual or a domestic or foreign business or nonprofit corporation (authorized to transact business in this State) as a receiver. The court may require the receiver to post bond, with or without sureties, in an amount the court directs.

The court shall describe the powers and duties of the receiver in its appointing order, which may be amended from time to time. Such powers may include without limitation the power:

To dispose of all or any part of the assets of the corporation wherever located, at a public or private sale, if authorized by the court;

To sue and defend in his own name as receiver of the corporation in all courts of this State; and

To exercise all of the powers of the corporation, through or in place of its board of directors or officers, to the extent necessary to manage the affairs of the corporation in the best interests of its members and creditors.

The court from time to time during the receivership may order compensation paid and expense disbursements or reimbursements made to the receiver and his counsel from the assets of the corporation or proceeds from the sale of the assets.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-14-33.
Decree of dissolution.

If, after a hearing, the court determines that one or more grounds for judicial dissolution described in

G.S. 55A-14-30

exist, it may enter a decree dissolving the corporation and specifying the effective date of the dissolution, and the clerk of the court shall deliver a certified copy of the decree to the Secretary of State, who shall file it.

After entering the decree of dissolution, the court shall direct the winding up and liquidation of the corporation’s affairs in accordance with

G.S. 55A-14-06

and the notification of its claimants in accordance with

G.S. 55A-14-07

and

G.S. 55A-14-08

. The corporation’s name becomes available for use by another entity as provided in

G.S. 55D-21

.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1967, c. 823, s. 23; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 42; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 2001-358, s. 24; 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

§§ 55A-14-34 through 55A-14-39.

Reserved for future codification purposes.